Mississippi, session 2026, SB2520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  As used in this section: (a)  "Bell to bell" means the time between the first bell ringing at the start of the school day to begin instructional time until the dismissal bell at the end of the school day to end instructional time; and (b)  "Personal electronic device" means a personal device capable of connecting to a smart phone, the internet, or a cellular or Wi-Fi network, or directly connecting to another similar device. Personal electronic devices include, but are not limited to, smart watches, smart headphones, laptops, tablets, and smart glasses.  "Personal electronic devices" shall not include school-issued or school approved devices that are specifically limited for use in classroom instruction. (2)  By July 1, 2027, each local public school district shall adopt a policy prohibiting students from using cell phones and personal electronic devices while on the campus of a local public school district from bell to bell.  The policy shall include disciplinary procedures for violations. (3)  The policy adopted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may provide for exceptions including, but not limited to: (a)  Emergency use of cell phones or personal electronic devices by students during the school day; and (b)  Use of cell phones or personal electronic devices by students who use them to monitor health issues. (4)  By no later than October 1, 2027, each local public school district shall submit a copy of the policy adopted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, or if applicable, a policy that is more restrictive than what is required under this subsection, to the Department of Education. (5)  By no later than October 1, 2027, and each October 1 thereafter, each local public school district shall notify the Department of Education changes made to the policy adopted pursuant to subsection (b) of this section in the previous school year, and if changes were made, submit the updated policy to the Department of Education. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.